1.      Introduction
World Rugby has developed this Privacy Statement to illustrate its commitment to the protection of the privacy and personal information of data subjects who interact with World Rugby.
When we refer to “World Rugby”, “we”, “us” or “our” in this Privacy Statement, we are referring to World Rugby, the world governing body of the sport of rugby union, and its group of operating companies (including World Rugby Limited, Rugby World Cup Limited and World Rugby Tournaments Limited). World Rugby has appointed a data protection officer, Liam McKenna, to underpin its commitment to privacy. If you would like to contact us and/or our data protection officer, please see
here
.
This Privacy Statement is address to you if you are individual who interacts with, or whose data is managed by, World Rugby (e.g. if you are a fan, follower or subscriber of World Rugby, if you participate in the game of rugby in certain capacities and at certain levels, if you attend one of our events, enter our competitions, participate in any of our on-line or face-to-face training or education courses, etc.).
The purpose of this Privacy Statement is to you a better understanding of:
the types of your personal information which we collect;
how we use and share that information;
how we protect your data protection rights;
details on how you can found out more about how we use your information in and
other details relevant to how we give effect to the privacy of individuals.
For information on how we process your information on our websites, apps and other digital and social channels, please see
here
.
In some situations where we are collecting and processing your personal information, we will provide you with further information about the information we are collecting, the purposes for which we are using and sharing that information as well as any other information which is particularly relevant to such situations. When we do so, we may refer back to this Privacy Statement and the general principles set out here.
2.      Scope of activities
As the world governing body of the sport of rugby union with responsibility for regulating, promoting and developing rugby union, and the organiser and owner of international sporting events such as Rugby World Cup and World Rugby Sevens Series, World Rugby carries out a range of activities which may involve the processing of personal data, such as those listed below:
Operation of websites, apps and other digital and social channels
;
Organising tournaments and events
;
Operating a training and education service for rugby participants and those interested in rugby
;
Managing, recording and archiving information, results, imagery, footage and statistics from rugby matches
;
A range of regulatory activities relating to the sport of rugby union
, including:
Anti-doping activities
;
Anti-corruption activities
;
Disciplinary processes for breaches of the Laws of the Game
;
Reviewing and assessing player eligibility queries and disputes in accordance with World Rugby Regulation
;
Activities to support the high performance programmes of a range of Member Unions
;
Research activities to inform player welfare improvements and updates to World Rugby Regulations and the Laws of the Game
;
Player insurance
;
Specific systems
;
Assessing the development of rugby union at local, national and regional level within World Rugby’s Regions and member unions
.
The personal information that we process about you may vary depending on which of our activities we are carrying out.
Further details on the personal information we collect in connection with each of the above activities, the purposes for which personal information is processed in connection with those activities, the third parties to whom your data may be disclosed, and the lawful basis of the relevant processing is set out below.
a.      Websites, apps and other digital and social channels
In general, you can visit our websites without providing personal information but we may still collect aggregated and anonymised statistical data (as described below). However, many of your interactions with us via us via our websites, apps and other digital and social channels will involve you providing us with personal information, or us collecting your personal information. In those circumstances, we may use your personal information for the following purposes:
To enable you to create an account or profile with us or to subscribe to our newsletter(s) or mailing list(s);
To respond to your enquiries or otherwise correspond with you;
To provide you with content on our websites, apps and other digital and social channels and to continuously improve the performance of such platforms and channels;
To enable you participate in certain activities, facilities or services available on our websites, apps and channels (such as competitions, score/match predictors, fantasy rugby games, etc.;
To give effect to any preferences you share with us or that we observe from your use of our sites, apps and channels, so that we can make information which most interests you available to you (e.g. in order to personalise and improve your experience on our digital platforms, to personalise and/or tailor any communications that we may send you or for profiling purposes to enable us to personalise and/or tailor any marketing communications that you may consent to receive from us);
to track your activity on our digital platforms
to send information to you about World Rugby and its activities which you have requested;
to fulfil any contract that we may enter into with you;
send marketing information to you in ways set out in this Privacy Notice;
The table below describes the main purposes for which we process your personal information, the categories of your information involved and our lawful basis for being able to do this. For the purposes of this policy, please note that the purposes and lawful basis set out below apply equally if you are a child or an adult.
Purpose
Personal Information Used
Lawful Basis
Create and administer any
account(s) you have or create with us,
manage our relationship and communications with
you, and provide you access to information you request on our platforms
All contact and account profile details (your name, involvement in Rugby, age, country of residence, country supported, nationality, gender, your geographical location and/or your confirmation that you have read and agree with the Terms and Conditions applicable to the sites), your professional details (where appropriate to elements of our digital platforms such as the Media Zone) records of your interactions with us, and marketing preferences
This is necessary to enable us to properly manage and administer your agreement with us to set-up an account profile on our platforms
To send you marketing information we think you might find useful or which you have requested from us, including our news items, information about events, volunteering and/or tickets and information about our commercial partners.
All contact and account profile details and marketing preferences.
Where you have given us your explicit consent to do so.
To allow you to participate in competitions, games and other activities, facilities or services available on the sites, apps and platforms
All contact and account profile details, together with any other personal information you submit as part of your participation in the relevant competition, game or other services or activities (such as your answers to competition questions, your predictions as to the score of a match or your team selection and points in a fantasy rugby game)
This is necessary to enable us to properly manage and administer your participation in the relevant competition, game or other service.
To track your activity on our platforms via the use of cookies in accordance with our cookies policy
Activity tracking cookies which may contain information that relates to you.
Where you have consented to us using such cookies in accordance with our cookies policy.
To answer your queries, complaints or other correspondence with you. We have a legitimate interest to provide complaint handling services to you
Contact details and records of your interactions with us
We have a legitimate interest in providing you with a complaint handling services and otherwise responding to your queries.
We may collect information about your interaction with the sites and the services on the sites. This may include information about your computer and, where available, your IP address operating system and browser type. We may perform statistical analysis of user behaviour and characteristics in order to measure interest in and use of the various areas of the sites and to ascertain the number of users that have visited particular web pages. (“statistical data”). In performing statistical analysis, parts of the sites use Google Analytics (a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc.) to capture and analyze sites statistics
Information collected via statistical/analytical cookies
Where you have consented to us using such cookies in accordance with our cookies policy.
Online retargeting is another form of online advertising that allows us and some of our advertising partners to show you advertising based on your browsing patterns and interactions on the sites. We share and receive online data collected through cookies and similar technology with our advertising partners. This means that when you are on another website, you may be shown advertising based on your browsing patterns on our sites.
IP address, URL of the webpage you are visiting and activity tracking cookies which may contain information that relates to you.
Where you have consented to us using such cookies in accordance with our cookies policy.
We may share your personal information with companies, organisations or individuals in one or more of the following situations:
World Rugby may share your personal information with Rugby World Cup Limited (and with the organisers of any Rugby World Cup tournament) where you have requested that we do so and/or where it is necessary in order to provide you with information that you have requested (e.g. in relation to tickets for Rugby World Cup tournaments;
Certain associated organisations, where you have consented to us doing so. The associated organisations to which, with your permission (in both cases), we will release your personal information are limited to:
Member Unions of World Rugby;
our worldwide partners, official partners/sponsors, tournament sponsors and official suppliers; and
any third parties noted in our cookies policy (where you have consent to the use of relevant cookies).
Certain activities which may be available on the sites, apps and platforms (such as competitions or fantasy rugby games) may involve the sharing of some of your personal data (as noted above) with other individuals participating in that activity (e.g. where you enter into a fantasy rugby game league) with other players.
b.      Organising tournaments and events
Depending on the capacity in which you participate in, or attend, any of our tournaments or events (including multi-sport events that World Rugby participates in, such as the Olympic Games and Commonwealth Games), we may process your information in the following circumstances:
Ticketholders
: Where you have purchased tickets to one of our tournaments or events, or attend as a ticketholder, we may collect information about you such as your identification data, contact details, address details, requests for additional accessibility requirements (amenity seats) and any special seat location requests, purchase history, details of the payment method used (but not any financial or card data) ticket and seat allocation, and information relating to your attendance at our tournaments or events.
We use this information to process your requests for tickets and to deliver them to you, to provide you with access to the relevant tournament or event venue in accordance with applicable ticketing and admission terms and the security protocols in place at the relevant venue as well as any applicable health and safety or security regulations, to keep a record of transactions in accordance with good busines practice, and to analyse ticketing and demand data relating to our tournaments and events;
Accredited participant/official/supplier/volunteer/media or broadcast personnel
: Where you are attending, participating in or working or volunteering at a relevant tournament or event, and you require or have applied for accreditation to accreditation-controlled zones, information which we will collect and process may, depending on the capacity in which you apply for, or are granted, accreditation, include the information which you submit in the course of your Application (i.e. information regarding your name, your organisation and role, your date and place of birth, gender, contact details, address, passport details, preferred language, title/function, and designated venues for which you have received or are seeking accreditation), a passport-style photo of you, and, depending on the nature of the Accreditation you are seeking, details such as apparel sizing, your travel preferences and bookings, details of any dietary requirements or mobility restrictions which you provide to us and details of your acceptance of any terms and conditions relating to your accreditation.
We use this information (including by passing such information to organisations who have responsibilities for the organising and/or hosting of relevant tournaments or events) for identity verification and security purposes and for the purposes of the implementation of accreditation arrangements, to arrange (in certain cases) travel and other logistical details relating to the relevant tournament or event on your behalf, performance of applicable accreditation terms and conditions, to contact you and to facilitate your access to venues for which you have received accreditation.
Guest
: Where you are attending one of a relevant tournament or event as a guest, we may collect and process some or all of the following information, depending on the circumstances, your identification data, details of your organisation and your role within your organisation, your contact details, where applicable, details of your accommodation, travel and flight arrangements and bookings, your allocated seating and/or hospitality, and any dietary requirements or mobility restrictions relating to you that are communicated to us.
We use this information (including by passing such information to organisations who have responsibilities for the organising and/or hosting of relevant tournaments or events) for the purposes of conferring on you the benefits of being a guest at our event, to arrange (in certain cases) travel and other logistical details relating to the relevant tournament or event on your behalf, performance of applicable terms and conditions, to contact you and to facilitate your access to venues to which you’ve been invited.
Your voice, image and likeness may be included in any recordings of sound or images taken at the relevant event and, where applicable, such recordings may be used by us for the purposes of promoting and publicising the relevant. The processing of your personal data in this manner is on the basis of our legitimate interests in promoting and publicising the relevant.
Where we have been provided with information on any dietary requirements or mobility restrictions relating to you, we shall process such information on the basis of your explicit consent, which, by volunteering such information to us, we will deem you have given. You are free to withdraw such consent at any time by contacting us using the details below, but please note that, if you withdraw such consent, we may not be able to cater for your dietary or mobility needs. Where any requests are made to us in relation to any mobility or dietary requirements you may have, we will treat such requests as evidence of your consent for us to process information relating to your mobility or dietary needs to enable us to attempt to facilitate such requests.
We will share your personal data with the appointed hosts or organisers of the tournament or event, and suppliers who have been engaged in connection with the tournament or event, for the purposes of facilitating your attendance at the tournament or event.
Our law basis for using and disclosing your personal data for these purposes is that it is necessary for the performance of applicable ticketing, accreditation or guest programme terms and conditions and to confer benefits on you in respect of your attendance at the relevant tournament or event.
c.      Training and Education Services
Certain of our sites have been created to provide you with access to online training courses and modules relating to participation in rugby and provide you with information on training courses and events which you can attend in person and assessments which you can sit for further accreditation.
These sites involve additional processing (and sharing) of personal data in the context of their educational purposes and are subject to their own privacy statements, which will be communicated to you when you use those sites.
d.      Match information, results, statistics, imagery and footage
Where you participate in international rugby as a player, member of team management or medical staff, or as a match official, we will process personal data relating to your participation in international rugby, including match, team and player statistics, and still and moving imagery and footage of your participation in matches.
We process and publish this data (which may include imagery and audio visual footage of you) on the basis of our legitimate interests in maintaining comprehensive records of international rugby matches and to make these records available to the public and for media, promotional and journalistic purposes, and to carry out analysis of matches to analyse trends within the game of rugby and develop other insights into the game.
In connection with such purposes, World Rugby also operates official repository of match information for all international rugby matches and events, which necessarily involves the storage of match, team and player data for historical, research, promotional and journalistic purposes. This system is also used to gather squad and selection information from teams in advance of international rugby matches.
In connection with this system, World Rugby collects data on players and other rugby participants such as their name and other identification data, date of birth, place of birth, playing height and weight, promotional head shots, match reports (e.g. squad lists, substitutions and replacements, scorers, yellow and red cards), appearance and performance statistics.
This data is processed for the purposes of enabling team selection information to be confirmed by team management international rugby matches and events, to act as a centralised official source of team selection information, match results and match statistics, as well as providing an efficient process for match statistics to be directly logged into the central system, to act as the archive of international rugby, logging the results and other details (e.g team lists) of matches for posterity and to foster interest in the game by keeping all-time records and enabling media and World Rugby’s to track, analyse and profile, the development of the game over time, to make data available to support the ongoing promotion of international rugby, to allow direct access to certain information, statistics and records to sports media and rugby fans, and for operational and logistical matters relating to Tournament organisation, logistics and procedures (including disciplinary procedures) and logging the capturing of players for the purposes of World Rugby Regulation 8.
In the interests of ensuring the accuracy of the data collected for each player and other participant, World Rugby collects passport information in relation to new entrants onto the system. This allows World Rugby verify the accuracy of name and identification details relating to each player and other participant, and ensures that similarly named players can be correctly distinguished, in the interests of ensuring overall accuracy of their data.
As this system is intended to operate as the official archive / almanac of international rugby matches, results and statistics, certain personal data (e.g. details of a player’s selection in a particular match, and statistics relating to that match) will be kept indefinitely as a matter of historical record.
In addition to publishing this data via our sites, apps and channels, this data (excluding passport information which is used for identity verification purposes only) may be disclosed and shared in the following way:
Via publication and distribution of match statistics, images and footage, and team and player stats directly to the public on World Rugby platforms and via distribution to accredited media;
to companies involved in broadcast and online coverage and promotion of relevant matches and rugby more generally, and who need match, team and player information for these purposes. This may include commercial partners of World Rugby;
To tournament organisers and team management who need to access relevant data for administrative and management purposes.
Our
lawful basis
for processing this data is our legitimate interests in being able to process accurate and complete player, team and match information for the purposes identified above, and for historical and statistical purposes.
Individuals whose data are processed in this context for historical and statistical purposes have the right, subject to certain exceptions, to object to processing of personal data concerning him or her on grounds relating to his or her particular situation. They may do that by
contacting us using the details below
.
e.      Regulatory Activities
Many of the regulatory activities carried out by World Rugby in governing, regulating and developing the sport of rugby union involve the processing of personal information.
You can read further information below on the processing of personal information by World Rugby in the context of the regulatory activities listed below. In some cases, we have created specific privacy notices or statements for these activities, which you can visit by clicking the relevant link provided below.
i.      Anti-doping
As a signatory of the World Anti-Doping Code, World Rugby is required to process personal data in order to detect anti-doping rule violations in order to ensure that the risk of the integrity of the sport of rugby union being damaged by doping.
You can find more information on how World Rugby processes personal information in the context of its anti-doping activities at
world.rugby/privacy-policy/anti-doping
.
ii.      Anti-corruption
To enable World Rugby to further its efforts to preserve the fundamental character of sporting competition as an honest test of skill and ability and to prevent corrupt gambling practices from undermining the integrity of the Game, World Rugby has developed its own Anti-Corruption Regulations, which gives World Rugby power to investigate betting and integrity breaches by those participating in the game of rugby union.
You can find more information on how World Rugby processes personal information in the context of its anti-corruption activities at
world.rugby/privacy-policy/anti-corruption
.
iii.      Disciplinary processes
As part of World Rugby’s role as the world governing of rugby, World Rugby’s role in disciplinary processes within the sport require it to process personal data relating to players and other participants in the sport in connection with the investigation and reporting of breaches of any of the provisions contained in the Laws of the Game and the World Rugby Regulations Relating to the Game. This requires us to process categories of personal data such as names and other identification data, and details and evidence relating to the Laws of the Game and the World Rugby Regulations Relating to the Game, both in the context of World Rugby’s own tournaments and across the game of rugby more generally. This data is processed in accordance with the procedures set out in World Rugby Regulations 18, 19, 20 and 21.
Our
lawful basis
for processing personal data for these purpose is that the processing is necessary in our legitimate interests as the global governing body for investigating and sanctioning breaches the Laws of the Game and the World Rugby Regulations Relating to the Game.
iv.      Player eligibility
In accordance with its role under World Rugby Regulation 8, World Rugby may collect and process data relating to a player’s eligibility to represent a national representative team of a Union to give rulings, resolve disputes, enforce the rules set out in World Rugby Regulation 8 and to make information available to Unions so that they may comply with their own obligations under World Rugby Regulation 8. The data which may be processed by World Rugby in these situations include Passport data, birth certificates, proof of residence, passport, birth certificate or other information relating to a parent or grandparent of a player, information relating to past appearances made by a player in international rugby.
Our
lawful basis
for processing personal data for these purposes is that the processing is necessary in our legitimate interests as the global governing body in protecting the integrity of international competition in the Game of Rugby by (a) ensuring genuine, close, credible and established national links between players and the countries they are representing; and (b) ensuring that the genuineness of the link between a player and the country they are representing by preventing (save in limited circumstances) players from representing more than one country, ensuring that evidence is available to demonstrate such links between players and the country of the Union they are representing and ensuring that breaches of World Rugby’s eligibility rules can be detected and sanctioned appropriately in order to protect the integrity of international competition.
v.      High Performance activities
Pursuant to World Rugby’s mandate to increase participation and competitiveness in global rugby, World Rugby makes a financial investment in high performance programmes of selected Member Union. As part of this activity, World Rugby collects performance data on teams and players (including personal data relating to players) in the interests of assessing the investment decisions it has made and to inform future investment decisions.
Further details on the personal data processed in the context of this activity is available at
world.rugby/privacy-policy/high-performance
.
vi.      Research
World Rugby carries out a range of research activities to inform player welfare improvements and updates to World Rugby Regulations and the Laws of the Game. These research activities are alternatively carried out by World Rugby’s own internal research unit, often in collaboration with independent research partners, or by third party research bodies who are receive funding from World Rugby.
A summary of data protection considerations connected to the main research projects carried on by World Rugby’s Research Unit is available at
world.rugby/privacy-policy/project-summary
.
vii.      Player insurance
World Rugby maintains player insurance policy cover that its Member Union may purchase or avail of to cover their players when on international duty if those Member Unions wish.
In order to arrange such cover, World Rugby collects date of birth and a salary range information relating to players who will be subject to such cover. In the event that a claim needs to be made on such insurance, World Rugby may be required to collect medical and injury information relating to a player from the relevant Member Union and to share data relating to such claim and the specific injury or illness suffered with the relevant insurers and Member Union.
Our
lawful basis
for this processing is that it is necessary for the performance of a contract to which the relevant players are a beneficiary (i.e. the insurance policy) and that it is necessary for the processing and exercise of claims under the insurance policy.
viii.      Specific systems
In the context of its regulatory activities, World Rugby operates a number of systems connected with specific regulatory functions that may process personal data (e.g. in relation to referee performance management, High Performance training, artificial turf assessment and regulation, “World Rugby approved” label ordering, investment and funding applications, and rugby information management).
Where you are a user of one of these systems, we will need to process your personal information for the purposes of registering you as a user of the relevant system(s) and providing you with the access that you need. In such context, we will process data such as your name, email address, user ID, the systems that you are entitled to access and the scope of such access, and will safely store your password information. Your data may be processed within a single-sign-on or identity and authentication management service that creates, maintains and manages user identity information and provides you authentication services across different World Rugby systems.
Our
lawful basis
for processing this information is that it is necessary to perform a contract with you for the provision of safe, secure and appropriate access to our system(s) which you are accessing in accordance with good identity and authentication management practices.
To the extent that additional information is processed about you in connection with the operation of any of these systems which you are accessing, you will be provided with further details on this when you access such system.
ix.      Assessing the development of rugby union at local, national and regional level within World Rugby’s Regions and member unions.
In connection with World Rugby’s mandate to drive participation in rugby at all levels of the game, World Rugby receives regular reports from its member unions and regional associations regarding participation and development in rugby throughout the world. In general, data processed by World Rugby in the context of these activities is aggregated and anonymised. However, depending on the uniqueness or noteworthiness of a particular development activity that is reported on, individuals may be identifiable in connection with such activity. In those circumstances, the personal data collected is limited to the identity of relevant data subjects and their participation in a particular rugby development project.
Such personal data is processed by World Rugby in connection with its role in monitoring the driving the development of the game of rugby and, where appropriate in the context of a particular rugby development project, for the purposes of highlighting and promoting such project and rugby development activities more generally.
Our
lawful basis
for processing personal data in the context of these activities is our legitimate interests in monitoring, driving and promoting the development of rugby throughout the world, taking into account that the nature of any personal data processed is limited and proportionate.
3.      Right to withdraw consent and performing contracts
If you have given us your consent to anything we do with your personal data, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time (although if you do so, it does not mean that anything we have done with your personal data with your consent up to that point is unlawful). This includes your right to withdraw consent to us using your personal data for marketing purposes. You may withdraw your consent to receiving marketing communications from us by contacting us using the details below, or by using the unsubscribe option available to you in each communication. If you have opted in to receive any information from our associated organisations and wish to unsubscribe from their communications, please contact those organisations directly or use the unsubscribe option available to you in their communications.
In circumstances indicated above, we may also process your personal data for the purposes of performing a contract with you (e.g. in relation to your performance or attendance at one of our tournaments or events, or to you accessing features on one of our sites or systems). Our ability to perform such contracts is depending on your providing such information. Failure on your part to provide the personal data which we have requested in these circumstances will result in the contract not being rendered impossible (with the potential consequences, for example, that you will not be able to participate in our tournament or event, attend any such tournament or event in any capacity, or access a system to which you are seeking access).
4.      Disclosures of your data
In addition to the specific disclosures of your data referenced, detailed or set out in
section 2
above, we will also share your personal data with third parties in the following circumstances:
We may need to provide third party service providers with access to your information to enable us to obtain maintenance, administrative or technical support for any the sites, apps, platforms, systems or processes referenced above, or where such third parties perform functions on our behalf or provide services to us (e.g. professional advisors, technology providers and hosting companies; advertising companies and exchanges; analytics companies; payment providers; fraud and credit checking companies). These service providers are not authorised by us to use or disclose personal data except as necessary to perform services on our behalf or comply with legal requirements;
Where we need to share your personal data to provide a product or service you have requested;
Where relevant, we may share your personal information with a Member Union or Regional Association or tournament organiser in connection with combined regulatory activities undertaken by us and such other organisation;
We may also share your personal information with third parties:
when required by law or in response to legal process;
in response to a request from law enforcement relating to a criminal investigation;
to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, or that of the public;
to analyse our data, conduct mobile analytics services or to maintain and improve our services (subject to confidentiality agreements as appropriate);
to permit us to pursue available remedies or limit damage that we may sustain;
if the rights or safety of another individual might be violated or in threat; and
where you otherwise consent to us doing so.
5.      International transfers of your data
In some of the circumstances described above, your personal data may be transferred, accessible or visible to individuals and/or entities located outside of the European Union. Countries outside the European Union may not provide a level of legal protection for your information as strong as the level of protection provided in Ireland or your home country. Where we transfer your personal data to a recipient based outside the European Union, we will put in place a data transfer agreement with the overseas recipient of the information, protecting the information, in the appropriate standard form approved for this purpose by the European Commission (please contact us if you would like to see a copy of any of these agreements). The only exceptions are where we transfer information to member states of the European Economic Area or to countries outside the European Union which have been determined to provide an adequate level of protection by the European Commission, or where the transfer is legally justified on another basis.
6.      How long do we keep your information?
The duration for which we retain your personal information will differ depending on the type of information and the reason why we collected it from you. We will only retain your personal information for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes we collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements. To determine the appropriate retention period for personal data, we take into account the following considerations:
the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the personal data;
the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your personal data;
the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means;
our contractual obligations and rights in relation to the personal data involved; and
applicable legal requirements (including prescribed retention periods and statutes of limitations).
In some circumstances we may anonymise your personal information so that it can no longer be associated with you, in which case we may use such information without further notice to you.
7.      Your rights to access, correct, modify and/or remove your personal information
In addition to your right to withdraw consent referenced
above
, you have the following rights under applicable law, although your ability to exercise these rights may be subject to certain conditions:
the right to receive a copy of and/or access, correct, and/or modify the personal data that we hold about you, together with other information about our processing of that personal data;
the right to request that any inaccurate data that is held about you is corrected, or if we have incomplete information you may request that we update the information such that it is complete;
the right, in certain circumstances, to request that we erase your personal data; and
the right, in certain circumstances, to request that we no longer process your personal data for particular purposes, or object to our use of your personal data or the way in which we process it.
If you have any questions about this privacy policy, the practices of the sites or your dealings with the sites, you can contact us at the contact details as set out below.
8.      Contact details
If you want to
delete your account
, or if have any queries in relation to this privacy statement, or if you would like to contact World Rugby in relation to your rights, please write to us at
dataprotection@worldrugby.org
or World Rugby House, 8 – 10 Lower Pembroke Street, Dublin 2.
You can contact our Data Protection Officer by emailing
dataprotection@worldrugby.org
9.      Complaints
If you are not happy with the way that we have used your information or address your rights, you have the right to make a complaint to the Irish Data Protection Commission by using the following link:
https://forms.dataprotection.ie/contact
.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://world.rugby/privacy-policy/anti-doping:
Global Partners
World Rugby
Fixtures & Results
Fixtures & Results
Calendar
Competitions
World Rugby Rankings
Tournaments
Tournaments
Women's Rugby World Cup 2025
HSBC SVNS
Men's Rugby World Cup 2027
WXV
Pacific Nations Cup
Pacific Challenge
Six Nations
HSBC Sevens Challenger
Olympic Games
Paris 2024
Matches
Pools and standings
Teams
Qualifying
FAQ
History
Sign up
Solidarity
U20 Championship
U20 Trophy
Pacific Four Series
Videos
The Game
The Game
World Rugby Awards
Roll of Honour
Voting panel
World Rugby Hall of Fame
Laws of the game
Definitions
Laws by number
Variations
Match official signals
Global law trials
Law application guidelines
Clarifications in law
Beginner's guide to rugby
About the game
Training and Education
Online learning modules
Face to face learning
Global coaching qualifications
Medical education equivalence
Contacts
Game participation
Growth strategy
Get Into Rugby
T1 Rugby
Rugby Rising Play
Game Systems
Information Management
Match Technology
Innovation
Technical Solutions
High performance
Match officials
Game analysis
Player welfare
Medical
Guidelines
Women's Health
Research
Conferences
Facilities and Equipment
Training and Education
Anti doping
Impact Beyond
Impact Beyond 2025
Resources
Find rugby
Get involved
Follow women's rugby
ChildFund Rugby
Facilities and Equipment
Pitch planning and design
Artificial Surfaces
Natural turf
Equipment
Anti doping
What we do
Nutrition and supplements
Medication & Prohibited substances
Educational resources
Cases and reports
News and video
Anti-corruption
Inside World Rugby
Inside World Rugby
About us
About World Rugby
Our vision
Our people and values
Contact us
Women's Rugby
Membership
Unions & regions
Member services
Membership criteria
Governance
Bye Laws
Regulations
Organisation Structure
Discipline
Safeguarding
Eligibility
Anti-doping
Anti-corruption
Our vision
Decade of growth
Challenge & change
Our game changers
Our values
Sustainability
Rugby and Sustainability
Diversity and Inclusion
Colour blindness in rugby
Careers at World Rugby
News
News
All news
All video
Media Zone
Building Character Since 1886
English
English
Français
Español
日本語
Download the HSBC Sevens App
Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Doping Control Related Data
1. This Information Notice is intended to set out in more detail how your Doping Control Related Data (as defined below) will be used and processed by World Rugby and other Persons for the purposes of implementing the Anti-Doping Rules set out in World Rugby Regulation 21 in accordance with the Code in order to ensure harmonised, coordinated and effective anti-doping programmes for detection, deterrence and prevention of doping. Any documentation or notice provided to Players by World Rugby, any Anti-Doping Organisation or Delegated Third Party acting under World Rugby Regulation 21 (including any informed consent forms, tournament participation terms or agreements, doping control forms, Out-Of-Competition doping control notifications or forms or any other forms or documents relating to Anti-Doping Activities) should be read in conjunction with this Information Notice.
World Rugby has its principal place of business at World Rugby House, 8-10 Pembroke Street Lower, Dublin 2, Ireland. World Rugby’s data protection officer is Liam McKenna, and you can contact the data protection officer by emailing
dataprotection@worldrugby.org
. World Rugby’s data protection officer is World Rugby’s designated Person for the purposes of paragraph 4.5 of the WADA International Standard on the Protection of Privacy and Personal Information.
For more information on World Rugby’s privacy practices, policies and protocols, please see here:
https://www.world.rugby/privacy-policy
.
Unless defined in this Information Notice, capitalised terms used in this notice have the meanings given in World Rugby Regulation 21.
Categories of Data
This section describes the types of data that might be collected about you when you engage with the doping control process.  It includes biological data processed when you provide a sample, and medical data from documents like Therapeutic Use Exemptions.
2. Your Doping Control Related Data is any and all data with respect to the Doping Control process related to you (including test distribution planning, Sample collection and handling, laboratory analysis, records of the Education you have been provided with, Results Management, hearings and appeals), Athlete Biological Passport information, intelligence gathered as part of Anti-Doping Activities, Therapeutic Use Exemptions, whereabouts (including your home address) and other data relating to you which is collected pursuant to Anti-Doping Activities under World Rugby Regulation 21.
3. The laboratory analysis results may include, without limitation: detection of a Prohibited Substance, its Metabolites or Markers or any evidence of use of a Prohibited Method identified on the Prohibited List; detection of the presence of other substances not included on the Prohibited List as may be directed by WADA pursuant to a monitoring programme described in Article 4.5 of the Code; longitudinal profiling of haematological parameters such as haemoglobin and red blood count over a specified period of time as well as testosterone/epitestosterone ratio; and/or results from other tests that may be developed in the future to identify the presence of Prohibited Substances or Prohibited Methods.
4. Some of your Doping Control Related Data constitutes “personal data” as defined under applicable data protection or privacy laws and “Personal Information” as defined in the WADA International Standard on the Protection of Privacy and Personal Information. Some of your Coping Control Related Data may also constitute “special categories of personal data” as defined under applicable data protection or privacy laws and “Sensitive Personal Information” as defined in the WADA International Standard on the Protection of Privacy and Personal Information.
Responsibility
This section describes what responsibilities the organisations who collect your anti-doping information have in terms of storage, security and processing, and sets out the ways in which World Rugby will use and process your data.  It also sets out your responsibility to ensure that the information provided by you, or on your behalf is accurate.
5. Your Doping Control Related Data will be collected by an Anti-Doping Organisation (including without limitation World Rugby) acting pursuant to Regulation 21 and/or the Code (“the Testing Authority”), or through an authorised collection authority and/or results management authority. The Testing Authority will be responsible for protecting your information in accordance with its local laws and regulations, the WADA International Standard on the Protection of Privacy and Personal Information and Regulation 21 and/or the Code or equivalent anti-doping rules.
6. The Testing Authority will use a data-management system (which may be in electronic form including but not limited to the ADAMS system) to process and manage, including disclose to authorised recipients, your Doping Control Related Data. The management, handling and sharing of your Doping Control Related information on ADAMS will be governed by WADA’s ADAMS privacy policy which is available here:
https://adams-help.wada-ama.org/hc/en-us/articles/360012071820-ADAMS-Privacy-Policy
.
7. You will be responsible for ensuring that all information which you provide or that is provided on your behalf by other parties, such as your Union, is accurate and up to date, including with respect to your whereabouts.  Please note that failure to provide and/or update accurate whereabouts information is likely to constitute an anti-doping rule violation, whether the failure is intentional or negligent. Where you have been provided with user access to ADAMS, you will have an opportunity to review personal information relating to you which is stored on ADAMS, and will have the ability to update any parts of such personal information which are inaccurate or out-of-date. If you are provided with a password to access to ADAMS or any other data-management system you will be responsible for keeping this password confidential at all times. Should you inadvertently or otherwise disclose such password you should contact the Testing Authority immediately.
8. We will process your Doping Control Related Data (which may include special categories of personal data) for the following purposes:
a) to determine whether your use of a Prohibited Substance or Prohibited Method is consistent with the provisions of a TUE (which processing will be proportionate and relevant to the making of this determination in accordance with Regulation 21 and/or the Code and/or the International Standard for Therapeutic Use Exemptions);
b) in order to perform Testing (e.g., test distribution planning, creating test missions, Sample collection, Sample handling, Sample transport to the laboratory or associated matters) in accordance with Regulation 21 and/or the Code and/or the International Standard for Testing and Investigations;
c) in order to track and monitor whereabouts information relating to you so that we can fulfil our Testing obligations under the Code and conduct an effective programme to detect doping;
d) gathering of Athlete Biological Passport information in accordance with our obligations under the Code and in order to carry out effective doping detection programmes;
e) in order to engage in investigations and carry out Results Management (including associated disciplinary hearings, appeals and adjudications) for the purposes of investigating and establishing one or more anti-doping rule violations in accordance with Regulation 21 and/or the Code and/or the International Standard for Results Management and the International Standard for Testing and Investigations; and
f) the collecting of education records (details relating to anti-doping education courses you have attended or completed) in order to verify whether you have received the level of anti-doping education appropriate to your involvement in the Game and to ensure that anti-doping education is delivered effectively.
Disclosures
This section describes how data collected about you, and that you provide as part of the doping control process, will be shared with other organisations for the purposes of operating such controls.
9. Your Doping Control Related Data will, where appropriate, be made available to authorised Anti-Doping Organisations, in accordance with Regulation 21 and/or the Code or equivalent anti-doping rules, to enable them to administer their anti-doping programmes. These Anti-Doping Organisations may include, without limitation, National Anti-Doping Organisations, international or national sporting federations including without limitation World Rugby, Major Event Organisations and National Olympic Committees.  Where this occurs, such Anti-Doping Organisations will be responsible for protecting your information in accordance with their local laws and regulations, the WADA International Standard on the Protection of Privacy and Personal Information and Regulation 21 and/or the Code or equivalent anti-doping rules. Your Doping Control Related Data may also be shared with any third party agent (including Delegated Third Parties) where relevant to their activities and with Unions and Associations in connection with Results Management, reporting and sanctioning processes and to enable Unions and Associations fulfil their obligations under Regulation 21.
10. Your Doping Control Related Data will also be made available, in part, to WADA, which will need to process certain information in order to fulfil its obligations and responsibilities under the Code. In such case WADA will be responsible for protecting your information in accordance with its local laws and regulations, the WADA International Standard on the Protection of Privacy and Personal Information and the Code, and its own privacy policy which you can review here:
https://www.wada-ama.org/en/privacy-policy
.
11. WADA accredited laboratories will need to receive your Samples and possibly other data relating to you; however, such laboratories will only be provided with de-identified, key-coded data and Samples that will not enable the laboratories to identify you.
12. The Anti-Doping Organisations, WADA and WADA accredited laboratories will process your Doping Control Related Data only for the purpose of ensuring harmonised, coordinated and effective anti-doping programmes.
13. Anti-Doping Organisations, WADA, and WADA accredited laboratories will not disclose any of your Doping Control Related Data other than to those persons within their organisation who require it for Doping Control purposes. Each of the organisations accessing and using any of your Doping Control Related Data may only do so in order to fulfil their responsibilities and obligations arising under Regulation 21 and/or the Code or equivalent anti-doping rules, which primarily involve the establishment and maintenance of anti-doping programmes and ensuring appropriate information sharing as provided for under Regulation 21 and/or the Code or equivalent anti-doping rules.
14. Your Doping Control Related Data (in particular data relating to an actual or potential anti-doping rule violation) may be Publicly Disclosed in accordance with the requirements of, and subject to satisfaction of the conditions set out in, the Code, the WADA International Standard on the Protection of Privacy and Personal Information and Regulation 21.14.3.
Legal basis for processing Doping Control Related Data
15. Our legal basis for processing (which in this notice shall have the meaning given in applicable law and shall include, for the avoidance of doubt, retaining and disclosing) your Doping Control Related Data is the consent you provide in any applicable Doping Control form (or other applicable consent forms) and/or applicable law which provides for or requires such processing and/or the necessity of such processing in the performance of a public interest task, for reasons of substantial public interest or public health, for the fulfillment of a contract, and/or to protect your vital interests or those of another Person. We may also need to process your Doping Control Related Data, regardless of whether you withdraw or refuse to grant consent, where necessary to establish, exercise or defend legal claims (including in relation to investigations into suspected violations of the Code and/or Regulation 21 or proceedings involving suspected violations of the Code and/or Regulation 21 or equivalent anti-doping regulations).
International Transfers
16. While World Rugby is established in the European Economic Area (EEA), your Doping Control Related Data may be transferred or made available to persons or parties, including WADA, Anti-Doping Organisations and Delegated Third Parties, located outside of the EEA, in countries where you train, compete or travel.  In some other countries, data protection and privacy laws may not provide equivalent protections to those provided in the EEA. If we transfer personal data to such locations, save where derogations apply under applicable laws and regulations, we will ensure that appropriate measures are in place to comply with our obligations under applicable law governing such transfers. Such measures may include entering into ‘standard contractual clauses’ in the form approved by the European Commission. If you would like to receive further details of the measures that we have taken in this regard, please contact us using the contact details set out below.
Your Rights
This section describes your rights with regards to data about you that is obtained and processed as part of your engagement with doping control, and how you can submit a compliant if you consider that it has not been used or processed correctly.
17. You may have the following rights under the WADA International Standard on the Protection of Privacy and Personal Information in relation to your Doping Control Related Data: (a) the right to be informed by us whether we process your personal information; (b) the right to be provided with certain information about our processing of your personal information and (c) including rights to obtain a copy of your Doping Control Related Data.
18. You also have the following rights under applicable law in relation to your Doping Control Related Data, subject to certain exemptions: a) the right to access your personal data; b) the right to request the rectification and/or erasure of your personal data;  c) the right to restrict the use of your personal data;  d) the right to object to the processing of your personal data or withdraw your consent to the processing of personal data; and e) where we are processing personal data based on your consent, the right to receive your personal data, which you provided to us, in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format or to require us to transmit that data to another controller;
19. To the extent that you have any complaints about the processing of your Doping Control Related Data, you may contact World Rugby by sending an email to
dataprotection@WorldRugby.org
or by writing to us at the following address: World Rugby Limited, World Rugby House, 8-10 Pembroke St Lower, Dublin 2, Ireland. You may also consult with the Testing Authority, WADA (www.wada-ama.org), your Union and/or your National Anti-Doping Organisation, as appropriate.
If you are unsatisfied with any response you receive from us, you have the right to lodge a complaint relating to the processing of your personal data to the Irish Data Protection Commission by using the following link:
https://forms.dataprotection.ie/contact
. If you wish, you may also contact another data protection supervisory authority of your choice. You can also notify WADA of your complaint, who may then review the complaint in accordance with the International Standard for Code Compliance by Signatories.
Data Retention
20. World Rugby will retain each category of your Doping Control Related Data in accordance with the retention periods (and based on the rationale) set out in Annex A to the
WADA International Standard for the Protection of Privacy and Personal Information
. Where a Results Management decision relating to you is Publicly Disclosed and is considered to form part of important legal precedent and part of the public record, such decision may be retained indefinitely. We will also retain your Education records in accordance with our retention policies that are in place for our training and education practices (please see: [insert Iris privacy statement link) for further details.
Objecting, withdrawing consent or refusing to participate in Doping Controls
This section describes your right to withdraw your consent to the use and processing of your personal data, and what the consequences are for you if you choose to do so.
21. You understand and accept that the your submission of your Doping Control Related Data (including via you participation in Doping Controls including Testing) to any Person, and the collection, processing, disclosure and use of such information in accordance with, and for the purposes of implementing these Anti-Doping Rules (in accordance with the International Standard for the Protection of Privacy and Personal Information and as otherwise required to implement these Anti-Doping Rules) is a condition of your membership, accreditation and/or participation in the Game of Rugby.
22. Notwithstanding the above, you have the right to object and/or to withdraw your consent to the processing of your Doping Control Related Data, although in that event, and as noted above, it still may be necessary for World Rugby, or another Testing Authority or any Deleted Third Party, and WADA to continue to process certain parts of your Doping Control Related Data, where permitted by applicable law, to fulfil obligations and responsibilities arising under Regulation 21 and/or the Code or equivalent anti-doping rules and applicable laws, including to (a) commence or pursue analyses or investigations involving suspected anti-doping rule violations relating to you, (b) conduct or participate in proceedings involving suspected anti-doping rule violations relating to, and/or (c) establish, exercise or defend against legal claims.
23. You should also note that refusing to disclose or provide your Doping Control Related Data (including, without limitation, by refusing to participate in Doping Controls, including Testing), or objecting or withdrawing your consent to the processing or disclosure of your Doping Control Related data, may make anti-doping testing and procedures in accordance with Regulation 21 and/or the Code and/or equivalent anti-doping rules, as applicable, and the International Standards impossible. In such case a withdrawal of consent or objection could be equivalent to an anti-doping rule violation (whether it falls within the definition of Tampering or otherwise) which may exclude you from further participation in the Game, and may result in disciplinary or other sanctions being imposed upon you, such as disqualification from competitions in which you are scheduled to participate or the invalidation of results arising from prior competitions.
Accessibility
World Rugby: We value your privacy.
We and our third parties store, access and/or process information about your personal data, your devices and your online interactions using cookies, so we can provide, analyse and improve our services. This includes unique identifiers, such as your name and geolocation, or your browsing data.

With your permission we and our third parties may use precise geolocation data and identification through device scanning. You may click to consent to our and our third parties processing as described above. Alternatively you may access more detailed information and change your preferences before consenting or to refuse consenting. Please note that some processing of your personal data may not require your consent, but you have a right to object to such processing. Your preferences will apply to this website only.

You’re able to manage and withdraw your consent at any time via our cookie settings. To find out more, read our
Cookie Policy
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Cookies Settings
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 1
https://world.rugby/privacy-policy/anti-corruption:
Global Partners
World Rugby
Fixtures & Results
Fixtures & Results
Calendar
Competitions
World Rugby Rankings
Tournaments
Tournaments
Women's Rugby World Cup 2025
HSBC SVNS
Men's Rugby World Cup 2027
WXV
Pacific Nations Cup
Pacific Challenge
Six Nations
HSBC Sevens Challenger
Olympic Games
Paris 2024
Matches
Pools and standings
Teams
Qualifying
FAQ
History
Sign up
Solidarity
U20 Championship
U20 Trophy
Pacific Four Series
Videos
The Game
The Game
World Rugby Awards
Roll of Honour
Voting panel
World Rugby Hall of Fame
Laws of the game
Definitions
Laws by number
Variations
Match official signals
Global law trials
Law application guidelines
Clarifications in law
Beginner's guide to rugby
About the game
Training and Education
Online learning modules
Face to face learning
Global coaching qualifications
Medical education equivalence
Contacts
Game participation
Growth strategy
Get Into Rugby
T1 Rugby
Rugby Rising Play
Game Systems
Information Management
Match Technology
Innovation
Technical Solutions
High performance
Match officials
Game analysis
Player welfare
Medical
Guidelines
Women's Health
Research
Conferences
Facilities and Equipment
Training and Education
Anti doping
Impact Beyond
Impact Beyond 2025
Resources
Find rugby
Get involved
Follow women's rugby
ChildFund Rugby
Facilities and Equipment
Pitch planning and design
Artificial Surfaces
Natural turf
Equipment
Anti doping
What we do
Nutrition and supplements
Medication & Prohibited substances
Educational resources
Cases and reports
News and video
Anti-corruption
Inside World Rugby
Inside World Rugby
About us
About World Rugby
Our vision
Our people and values
Contact us
Women's Rugby
Membership
Unions & regions
Member services
Membership criteria
Governance
Bye Laws
Regulations
Organisation Structure
Discipline
Safeguarding
Eligibility
Anti-doping
Anti-corruption
Our vision
Decade of growth
Challenge & change
Our game changers
Our values
Sustainability
Rugby and Sustainability
Diversity and Inclusion
Colour blindness in rugby
Careers at World Rugby
News
News
All news
All video
Media Zone
Building Character Since 1886
English
English
Français
Español
日本語
Download the HSBC Sevens App
Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
1. Background
This Information Notice is intended to set out in more detail how your Anti-Corruption Related Data (as defined below) will be used and processed by World Rugby for the purposes of implementing the Anti-Corruption and Betting Rules set out in World Rugby Regulation 6.
Any documentation or notice provided to Players by World Rugby should be read in conjunction with this Information Notice.
World Rugby has its principal place of business at World Rugby House, 8-10 Pembroke Street Lower, Dublin 2, Ireland. World Rugby’s data protection officer is Liam McKenna, and you can contact the data protection officer by emailing
dataprotection@worldrugby.org
.
For more information on World Rugby’s privacy practices, policies and protocols, please see here:
https://www.world.rugby/privacy-policy
.
Unless defined in this Information Notice, capitalised terms used in this notice have the meanings given in World Rugby Regulation 6 (“
Regulation 6
”).
2. Scope of this Notice
This processing activities described in this notice apply to you if you are a Connected Person, or if you have otherwise agreed to be or have been required to, comply with and be bound by World Rugby Regulation (for example, on the basis that you will have access to Inside Information).
3. Processing of your Anti-Corruption Related Data (including lawful basis)
3.1 Categories:
Where you are subject to, or bound by Regulation 6, we may, in the circumstances described in Regulation 6, process the following personal data relating to you (referred to here as “
Anti-Corruption Related Data
”):
any reports which I submit to World Rugby, any Union, Rugby Body or Anti-Corruption Officer pursuant to my reporting obligations under Regulation 6;
any reports or evidence submitted to us relating to alleged conduct by you which may be in breach of Regulation 6 (known as “
Anti-Corruption Breaches
”), whether pursuant to our
Confidential Reporting Policy
or otherwise;
any information which World Rugby receives from third parties (including law enforcement authorities, Unions and Rugby Bodies) relating to actual or potential Anti-Corruption Breaches;
any personal records which, by agreeing to be bound by Regulation 6 (and you acknowledge that agreeing to be bound by Regulation 6 is a condition of participating in Rugby as a Connected Person), you have agreed to provide World Rugby (or Unions, Rugby Bodies or any Anti-Corruption Officer) and/or allow World Rugby (or Unions, Rugby Bodies or any Anti-Corruption Officer) to collect or seize in connection with any investigation into Anti-Corruption Breaches, including telephone records, bank account, credit card and transaction details, betting account records, internet and email records, computers and hard drives and other electronic information storage devices and documents, correspondence, addresses and contact details;
the results of any investigation into alleged Anti-Corruption Breaches and/or the decisions of any Judicial Officer, Judicial Committee or Appeal Committee pursuant to the procedures set out in Regulation 6.
3.2 Purposes
Your Anti-Corruption Related Data will be processed by World Rugby in the following ways:
your Anti-Corruption Related Data may be collected (including on request) and processed (e.g. recorded, retained, transmitted, and used) by and amongst the Company, World Rugby, Unions and law enforcement authorities, for the purposes of Regulation 6 and/or applicable laws;
in any manner World Rugby deems appropriate in accordance with and for the purposes of Regulation 6 (including in connection with any investigation or proceedings under Regulation 6 involving you or any other person);
to conduct any investigations or procedures set out in Regulation 6;
to publish any final decisions made with respect to Anti-Corruption Breaches in connection with Regulation 6; and
for any other connected purpose in the interests of World Rugby in maintaining the integrity of the sport of Rugby Union
3.3 Disclosures and transfers of your data
World Rugby may share any of your Anti-Corruption Related Data relating with any Union, Rugby Body, the Board, law enforcement authorities and/or any competent authority for the purposes of Regulation 6 and/or in accordance with applicable laws or the request of any law enforcement authority or other competent authority.
Some of these organisations may be located in countries outside of the European Economic Area and/or outside of the country in which you are resident and, in such circumstances, the Company shall comply with the requirements of applicable data protection law in respect of transfers of personal data outside of the European Economic Area and/or the country in which you are resident, to the extent that personal data is so transferred;
3.4 Lawful Basis
Our lawful bases for processing your Anti-Corruption Related Data is our legitimate interests in maintaining the integrity of the sport of Rugby Union, as well as any consent you provide in the context of your participation in rugby matches or competitions and/or applicable law which provides for such processing. We may also need to process your Anti-Corruption Related Data, regardless of whether you withdraw or refuse to grant consent, where necessary to establish, exercise or defend legal claims (including in relation to investigations into suspected violations of the Regulation 6 and/or applicable law or proceedings involving suspected violations of World Rugby Regulation 6 and/or applicable law).
4. Retention
We will retain your Anti-Corruption Related Data for as long as is necessary to conclude any investigations or disciplinary procedures in accordance with Regulation 6 and/or applicable law and to fulfil any legal obligations or directions of competent authorities with respect to the retention of such data. Where you are found to have committed an Anti-Corruption Breach pursuant to a decision taken under the procedures set out in Regulation 6, such decision may be published and retained in the interests of legal precedent.
5. Your rights under data protection law
You have the following rights under applicable law, although your ability to exercise these rights may be subject to certain conditions:
the right to receive a copy of and/or access, correct, and/or modify the personal data that we hold about you, together with other information about our processing of that personal data;
the right to request that any inaccurate data that is held about you is corrected, or if we have incomplete information you may request that we update the information such that it is complete;
the right, in certain circumstances, to request that we erase your personal data; and
the right, in certain circumstances, to request that we no longer process your personal data for particular purposes, or object to our use of your personal data or the way in which we process it.
If you have any questions about this privacy policy, the practices of the sites or your dealings with the sites, you can contact us at the contact details as set out below.
6. Contact
If you have any queries in relation to this notice, or if you would like to contact World Rugby in relation to your rights, please write to us at
ataprotection@worldrugby.org
or World Rugby House, 8 – 10 Lower Pembroke Street, Dublin 2.
You can contact our Data Protection Officer by emailing
dataprotection@worldrugby.org
.
7. Complaint
If you are not happy with the way that we have used your information or address your rights, you have the right to make a complaint to the Irish Data Protection Commission by using the following link:
https://forms.dataprotection.ie/contact
Accessibility
World Rugby: We value your privacy.
We and our third parties store, access and/or process information about your personal data, your devices and your online interactions using cookies, so we can provide, analyse and improve our services. This includes unique identifiers, such as your name and geolocation, or your browsing data.

With your permission we and our third parties may use precise geolocation data and identification through device scanning. You may click to consent to our and our third parties processing as described above. Alternatively you may access more detailed information and change your preferences before consenting or to refuse consenting. Please note that some processing of your personal data may not require your consent, but you have a right to object to such processing. Your preferences will apply to this website only.

You’re able to manage and withdraw your consent at any time via our cookie settings. To find out more, read our
Cookie Policy
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Cookies Settings
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 2
https://world.rugby/privacy-policy/high-performance:
Global Partners
World Rugby
Fixtures & Results
Fixtures & Results
Calendar
Competitions
World Rugby Rankings
Tournaments
Tournaments
Women's Rugby World Cup 2025
HSBC SVNS
Men's Rugby World Cup 2027
WXV
Pacific Nations Cup
Pacific Challenge
Six Nations
HSBC Sevens Challenger
Olympic Games
Paris 2024
Matches
Pools and standings
Teams
Qualifying
FAQ
History
Sign up
Solidarity
U20 Championship
U20 Trophy
Pacific Four Series
Videos
The Game
The Game
World Rugby Awards
Roll of Honour
Voting panel
World Rugby Hall of Fame
Laws of the game
Definitions
Laws by number
Variations
Match official signals
Global law trials
Law application guidelines
Clarifications in law
Beginner's guide to rugby
About the game
Training and Education
Online learning modules
Face to face learning
Global coaching qualifications
Medical education equivalence
Contacts
Game participation
Growth strategy
Get Into Rugby
T1 Rugby
Rugby Rising Play
Game Systems
Information Management
Match Technology
Innovation
Technical Solutions
High performance
Match officials
Game analysis
Player welfare
Medical
Guidelines
Women's Health
Research
Conferences
Facilities and Equipment
Training and Education
Anti doping
Impact Beyond
Impact Beyond 2025
Resources
Find rugby
Get involved
Follow women's rugby
ChildFund Rugby
Facilities and Equipment
Pitch planning and design
Artificial Surfaces
Natural turf
Equipment
Anti doping
What we do
Nutrition and supplements
Medication & Prohibited substances
Educational resources
Cases and reports
News and video
Anti-corruption
Inside World Rugby
Inside World Rugby
About us
About World Rugby
Our vision
Our people and values
Contact us
Women's Rugby
Membership
Unions & regions
Member services
Membership criteria
Governance
Bye Laws
Regulations
Organisation Structure
Discipline
Safeguarding
Eligibility
Anti-doping
Anti-corruption
Our vision
Decade of growth
Challenge & change
Our game changers
Our values
Sustainability
Rugby and Sustainability
Diversity and Inclusion
Colour blindness in rugby
Careers at World Rugby
News
News
All news
All video
Media Zone
Building Character Since 1886
English
English
Français
Español
日本語
Download the HSBC Sevens App
Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Data Protection Notice
The purposes of this notice is to provide details on the personal data which World Rugby Limited collects and processes in connection with its High Performance Data Insights Project.
For any queries relating to this notice, or relating to the personal data which we process in connection with the High Performance Data Insights Project, World Rugby Limited can be contacted using the contact details specified below. World Rugby Limited’s Data Protection Officer is Liam McKenna and you may contact the Data Protection Officer using the contact details specified below.
Further details on World Rugby Limited’s privacy practices and policies, as well as further details on how World Rugby Limited give effect to data subject rights, can be viewed here:
https://www.world.rugby/privacy-policy
.
What is the High Performance Data Insights Project?
The objective of the High Performance Data Insights Project is to collect, analyse and compare performance data at team and player levels from each of World Rugby’s High Performance Unions (“HP Unions”) in order to assess return on World Rugby’s High Performance investment in the HP Unions and their players, in accordance with the objectives of the World Rugby High Performance Investment Programme, namely to invest in high performance (15s and 7s) international teams in order to impact on the competitiveness of international rugby.
In order to achieve this, performance data will be collected from publicly available sources (including team sheets, match reports, match footage and match statistics) and data already held by World Rugby used to create performance profiles and insights on the HP Union players and teams. For benchmarking and comparative analysis purposes, data from top-tier national Unions (around 100 players in the selection pool for each top-tier Union) will also be collected for this Project for use on an aggregated basis for benchmarking purposes. This is to enable comparative insights to be generated between HP Union teams and players, and top international performance benchmarks.
Personal data processed
In connection with the above aims, we process the following personal data for the purposes stated below:
For players within the selection pool of a HP Union: data from a range of publicly available sources and from your HP Union will be gathered in order to create a performance profile for you, including name, age, position, appearances (for both club and country), selection and availability information (including whether you are unavailable for selection through injury or suspension), matches played, minutes played, match actions, match results and other match statistics (for both club and international matches);
For management of a team representing a HP Union: data from a range of publicly available sources and from your HP Union will be gathered in order to create a performance profile for you, including name, age, details of your role and your contract start and end date, details of matches in which you have been involved (including results and other statistics);
For players within the selection pool of top-tier Unions: data from a range of publicly available sources will be gathered about you in order to aggregate performance data to create top international performance benchmarks, against which HP Union performance can be compared.
Personal data will be processed using World Rugby’s business intelligence tools for the purposes of to develop data insights into the performance of teams and players and to assist in predicting future performance, in furtherance of the objectives of the World Rugby High Performance Investment Programme.
The
lawful basis
on which this personal data is processed is that this processing is considered necessary in the legitimate interests of World Rugby to fulfil the mandate which it has been given by its member Unions to invest in high performance (15s and 7s) international teams in order to impact on the competitiveness of international rugby. Analysing performance data in this manner is considered to be necessary, having regard to best practice in the area of assessment investment returns and opportunities, to appropriately and effectively judge the effectiveness of World Rugby’s current and future investments in the HP Unions.
We have carried out a data protection impact assessment to ensure that the privacy concerns of affected individuals have been taken into account in designing and implementing this project, and to ensure that World Rugby’s legitimate interests in carrying out this project are not overridden by the fundamental rights and freedoms of such individuals. If any affected individual wishes to receive a copy of this data protection impact assessment, this can be requested by contacting us using the details below.
Sharing personal data
We may share personal data with certain third parties in connection with the above purposes:
We may engage external consultants to assist and support the analysis of the data referenced above;
We may share your personal data with technology and IT service providers in connection with the analysis, processing and storage of data referenced above;
We may need to provide third party service providers with access to your information to enable us to obtain maintenance, administrative or technical support. These service providers are not authorised by us to use or disclose personal data except as necessary to perform services on our behalf or comply with legal requirements;
We will share data insights generated from our analysis with HP Unions, and, in some cases, this may involve sharing personal data with such Unions;
We may also share personal data with third parties:
when required by law or in response to legal process;
in response to a request from law enforcement relating to a criminal investigation;
to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, or that of the public;
to analyse our data, conduct mobile analytics services or to maintain and improve our services (subject to confidentiality agreements as appropriate);
to permit us to pursue available remedies or limit damage that we may sustain;
if the rights or safety of another individual might be violated or in threat; and
where you otherwise consent to us doing so.
International transfers of personal data
In some of the circumstances described above, personal data may be transferred, accessible or visible to individuals and/or entities located outside of the European Union. Countries outside the European Union may not provide a level of legal protection for personal data as strong as the level of protection provided in the EU. Where we transfer your personal data to a recipient based outside the European Union, we will put in place a data transfer agreement with the overseas recipient of the information, protecting the information, in the appropriate standard form approved for this purpose by the European Commission (please contact us if you would like to see a copy of any of these agreements). The only exceptions are where we transfer information to member states of the European Economic Area or to countries outside the European Union which have been determined to provide an adequate level of protection by the European Commission, or where the transfer is legally justified on another basis.
How long do we keep your information?
We will keep the personal data referred to above for as long as you continue to participate in international rugby. We have set up a process to remove the personal data of a player or coach when we become aware of their retirement from elite rugby.
Rights to access, correct, modify and/or remove your personal information
All individuals whose personal information is processed pursuant to this Project have the following rights under applicable law, although your ability to exercise these rights may be subject to certain conditions:
the right to receive a copy of and/or access, correct, and/or modify the personal data that we hold about you, together with other information about our processing of that personal data;
the right to request that any inaccurate data that is held about you is corrected, or if we have incomplete information you may request that we update the information such that it is complete;
the right, in certain circumstances, to request that we erase your personal data; and
the right, in certain circumstances, to request that we no longer process your personal data for particular purposes, or object to our use of your personal data or the way in which we process it.
If any such individual has any questions about this notice, or regarding the World Rugby Data Insights Project more generally, you can contact us at the contact details as set out below.
Contact details:
If you have any queries in relation to this privacy statement, or if you would like to contact World Rugby Limited in relation to your rights, please write to us at
dataprotection@worldrugby.org
or World Rugby House, 8 – 10 Lower Pembroke Street, Dublin 2.
You can contact our Data Protection Officer by emailing
dataprotection@worldrugby.org
.
Complaints
If you are not happy with the way that we have used your information or address your rights, you have the right to make a complaint to the Irish Data Protection Commission by using the following link:
https://forms.dataprotection.ie/contact
.
Accessibility
World Rugby: We value your privacy.
We and our third parties store, access and/or process information about your personal data, your devices and your online interactions using cookies, so we can provide, analyse and improve our services. This includes unique identifiers, such as your name and geolocation, or your browsing data.

With your permission we and our third parties may use precise geolocation data and identification through device scanning. You may click to consent to our and our third parties processing as described above. Alternatively you may access more detailed information and change your preferences before consenting or to refuse consenting. Please note that some processing of your personal data may not require your consent, but you have a right to object to such processing. Your preferences will apply to this website only.

You’re able to manage and withdraw your consent at any time via our cookie settings. To find out more, read our
Cookie Policy
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Cookies Settings
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 3
https://world.rugby/privacy-policy/research-project-summary:
Global Partners
World Rugby
Fixtures & Results
Fixtures & Results
Calendar
Competitions
World Rugby Rankings
Tournaments
Tournaments
Women's Rugby World Cup 2025
HSBC SVNS
Men's Rugby World Cup 2027
WXV
Pacific Nations Cup
Pacific Challenge
Six Nations
HSBC Sevens Challenger
Olympic Games
Paris 2024
Matches
Pools and standings
Teams
Qualifying
FAQ
History
Sign up
Solidarity
U20 Championship
U20 Trophy
Pacific Four Series
Videos
The Game
The Game
World Rugby Awards
Roll of Honour
Voting panel
World Rugby Hall of Fame
Laws of the game
Definitions
Laws by number
Variations
Match official signals
Global law trials
Law application guidelines
Clarifications in law
Beginner's guide to rugby
About the game
Training and Education
Online learning modules
Face to face learning
Global coaching qualifications
Medical education equivalence
Contacts
Game participation
Growth strategy
Get Into Rugby
T1 Rugby
Rugby Rising Play
Game Systems
Information Management
Match Technology
Innovation
Technical Solutions
High performance
Match officials
Game analysis
Player welfare
Medical
Guidelines
Women's Health
Research
Conferences
Facilities and Equipment
Training and Education
Anti doping
Impact Beyond
Impact Beyond 2025
Resources
Find rugby
Get involved
Follow women's rugby
ChildFund Rugby
Facilities and Equipment
Pitch planning and design
Artificial Surfaces
Natural turf
Equipment
Anti doping
What we do
Nutrition and supplements
Medication & Prohibited substances
Educational resources
Cases and reports
News and video
Anti-corruption
Inside World Rugby
Inside World Rugby
About us
About World Rugby
Our vision
Our people and values
Contact us
Women's Rugby
Membership
Unions & regions
Member services
Membership criteria
Governance
Bye Laws
Regulations
Organisation Structure
Discipline
Safeguarding
Eligibility
Anti-doping
Anti-corruption
Our vision
Decade of growth
Challenge & change
Our game changers
Our values
Sustainability
Rugby and Sustainability
Diversity and Inclusion
Colour blindness in rugby
Careers at World Rugby
News
News
All news
All video
Media Zone
Building Character Since 1886
English
English
Français
Español
日本語
Download the HSBC Sevens App
Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Part 1: High-level summary
A high-level summary of key points relating to the primary research projects undertaken by World Rugby is set out in the table below. Further details are available from the detailed summary in Part 2 below.
World Rugby processes all personal data in accordance with its
privacy statement
and further details on World Rugby’s general data protection policies, practices and procedures, as well as information on how individuals may contact us (and our Data Protection Officer) and exercise their rights under data protection law are set out in that document.
Project
Summary
Research objectives
Necessity and proportionality assessment
Retention
Third parties involved
HIA study
Research relating to the frequency and causes of concussions among elite rugby players, aimed at ensuring the effectiveness of the current HIA Protocol and reviewing safety of the laws of the game
The overall aim of the HIA Research Project is to continually evaluate how well the HIA Protocol is working and to identify any areas where detection and management of concussion can be improved
Processing data gathered through administering the HIA protocol is necessary to understand and better managing the risks of concussion, both of which play a key role in advancing and enhancing player welfare. Having regard to the research objectives, for the reasons stated below, the extent of personal data processes pursuant to the HIA study is considered to be proportionate.
HIA is an ongoing study in order to gain insights into concussion in rugby on a continuous basis, so data is retained in accordance with those principles. [Where a player retires, their data can be fully anonymised within the research data (i.e. by removing any unique ID number from the reports relating to that player)]
Team medical staff (who input HIA reports in accordance with the HIA protocol).
CSx Limited, a New Zealand company which provides the technology used in
Institute of Sport and Exercise Medicine, Stellenbosch University, an independent sports research institution which carries out quality assurance on data reported by medics and also supports the WRRU in developing research insights and producing academic papers.
Contractors and other research personnel engaged by World Rugby’s research unit.
Injury Surveillance Studies
Collection and research of data relating to the frequency and circumstances of injuries at World Rugby tournaments, and other selected tournaments and events
The overall aim of the Injury and Illness surveillance programme is to investigate the incidence and nature of injuries and illnesses sustained by players across relevant competitions
Processing data gathered through ISS is necessary to understand and manage injury risks in order to continually improve and enhance player safety .
An archiving process has been established for injury surveillance studies at specific tournaments, whereby, following conclusion of the tournament ISS study report, the database is fully anonymised so that it can be used in longitudinal studies over time.
Team medical staff (who submiit injury reports in accordance with the injury surveillance study methodology into the prescribed ISS application).
Dovetail Technologies Limited, who have been engaged by World Rugby in connection with the development and support of a specific application for the reporting and management of ISS data.
Contractors and other research personnel engaged by World Rugby’s research unit.
Part 2: Detailed Summary
1. Head Injury Assessment Research programme
a) Background
Concussion is a traumatic brain injury which can result in a range of impairments in neurological function that develop and resolve over varying periods of time. Within sport generally, but particularly contact and collision-orientated sports, concussion has grown prominent as a topic of interest owing to concerns over the short- and long-term health consequences of this injury for players.
World Rugby’s general policy is that everyone involved in Rugby should be able to recognise the signs and symptoms of concussion, and to remove any player displaying the signs or symptoms of concussion from playing or training. This policy is encapsulated in World Rugby’s “Recognise and Remove” principle, which reflects a zero-risk approach to the question of whether any player with clear or suspected symptoms of concussion should be permitted to continue to participate in a rugby match or training.
The Head Injury Assessment (the “HIA”) originated from a World Rugby-administered global trial to a enable temporary substitutions when it is unclear if a player has a suspected concussion. Under this trial, a relevant player could be temporarily substituted to enable medical personnel to carry out a HIA on the player following certain prescribed protocols (the “HIA Protocol”). Where, following certain prescribed protocols, medical personnel treating such player were able to establish that the player had not suffered a concussion, that player would be permitted to return to play. Otherwise, the temporary substitution would become permanent.
Following a successful trial period, temporary substitution for head injury was introduced permanently into Law for elite adult rugby in August 2015. The HIA Protocol is intended to support Law 3.11 of the Laws of the Game and World Rugby Regulation 10, both of which are relevant to temporary replacement for head injury and the management of concussion.
The HIA protocol is supported by a governance system to ensure the highest quality of medical management is provided to players. The HIA protocol for assessing players with a suspected concussion, including components of the off-field screening tool, were formulated following a review of the scientific literature, consideration of position statements, and formal consultation with concussion experts, sports medicine doctors, coaches, players and referees. The HIA protocol is subject to continual review and development by a working group of independent experts advising World Rugby.
b) Research Objectives
The overall aim of the HIA Research Project is to continually evaluate how well the HIA Protocol is working and to identify any areas where detection and management of concussion can be improved. For example, the data collected pursuant to this research programme are used to:
define normative reference values for delineating normal and abnormal baseline and post-injury HIA performance by players;
investigate the influence of factors that may modify HIA performance (e.g. familiarisation effects of multiple baseline tests, effect of previous concussion(s) on subsequent baseline performance, comparing baseline assessments conducted at rest and after exercise)
examine the diagnostic accuracy of the HIA Assessment process in detecting concussion;
evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of individual sub-modes of the HIA in detecting concussion;
compare the accuracy of new and evolving test modes and/or technologies with the existing HIA protocol;
The overall intended effect of the HIA Research Project is to enhance player safety over time by ensuring that the HIA Protocol ensures best practice for the detection and management of concussion in elite adult rugby.
c) Assessment of necessity and proportionality
Processing data gathered through administering the HIA protocol is necessary to understand and better managing the risks of concussion, both of which play a key role in advancing and enhancing player welfare.
The HIA research programme is essential to ensuring that the HIA Protocol remains effective and can continue to achieve its overall purpose of improving player safety. It is unlikely that the same outcomes could be achieved without collecting a significant body of data detailing the incidence and causes for head injuries, and the outcomes of HIA assessments.
HIA Data is accessed only by a dedicated research unit in World Rugby and at the Institute of Sport and Exercise Medicine, Stellenbosch University, who are experienced in handling sensitive research data. The mandate for using HIA Data, as approved by the World Rugby Research Ethics Committee, is player welfare and there is no prospect of data being used for other purposes.
The accuracy and completeness of the data collected for the HIA Research programme is, to a certain extent, dependent on the accuracy and quality of the information collected by the relevant doctors and medics through paper based and/or electronic HIA Forms. It is the responsibility of such doctors and medics to ensure that the HIA Forms are completed correctly and that the data submitted via the online platform is accurate. As a condition of using the HIA Protocol, competition organisers are required to have a HIA review process to ensure that the HIA Protocol is implemented correctly and that data has been collected properly and accurately.
The HIA Data is stored on Amazon Web Service servers located in Dublin, Ireland. Third-party technology support personnel, who are based in New Zealand, have access to the data for the purposes of providing reporting and analysis services to World Rugby and for maintenance and development purposes. To allow for the possibility of HIA Data being transferred to locations outside of the EEA or New Zealand (for example in the context of a tournament taking place outside of such jurisdictions), World Rugby has implemented appropriate safeguards in relation to such potential transfers.
To reduce the extent to which players may be identified from the HIA Data used in the HIA Research programme, the use of pseudonymised player reference numbers instead of player names has been adopted. It is appropriate to retain other information which may serve to enable players to be identified (e.g. team represented, date of match, etc) as this data is necessary to enable data collected at various stages of the HIA protocol to be linked to the same incident or player, and cross-reference relevant match footage to review the accuracy of data and obtain a better understanding of the cause and/or circumstances of a particular injury.
World Rugby takes a number of steps to ensure that players whose data may be collected during the course of the HIA Research Project are informed about and understand the uses that will be made of their data in connection with such research. These steps include:
World Rugby has developed and disseminated concussion education modules, which cover the essential information outlined in the HIA Protocol document and appendices, as well as the required standards for concussion management, immediate care in rugby and medical protocols for match-day medical staff. Players participating in tournaments and matches approved for the use of HIA Protocol are required to undertake these modules.
In respect of tournaments organised and controlled by World Rugby, World Rugby ensures that the Participation Agreement which all players participating in such tournaments are asked to sign, includes notification that HIA Data relating to such players may be collected and used for research purposes;
In relation to tournaments not organised by World Rugby, but in respect of which World Rugby has provided approval for the use of temporary replacements in accordance with the HIA Protocol, one of the conditions of World Rugby’s approval is that all team staff are provided with the explanation set out in the HIA Protocol document (at Appendix 3) in relation to the HIA Protocol and the HIA Research Project.
Information regarding player’s rights with respect to their HIA Data is included in the Player information notices included in the Participation Agreement for World Rugby tournaments. The research explanation letter included in the HIA Protocol document also provides players with information in relation to their rights.
2. Injury and Illness Surveillance at World Rugby Competitions
a) Background
Injury and illness are an unfortunate but inherent possibility when playing sport. Managing the risk of injury or illness to acceptable levels is a key feature of protecting player health. Studying the patterns and associated effects of injuries and illnesses in defined populations is a crucial underpinning in risk management, and can help to answer a number of key questions, such as:
What are the most prominent types of injury or illness, in terms of incidence or severity?
Has the frequency or severity of overall or specific types of injury or illness changed over time?
Which factors may influence the likelihood of individual(s) becoming injured or ill?
Has the introduction of a certain preventive measure been met with a reduction in injury or illness frequency or severity?
Outcomes of epidemiological studies into injury and illness can assist with identifying priority injury or illness types to target for prevention, identifying factors that protect or predispose to injury or illness, and determining the efficacy of preventive measures.
World Rugby is committed to implementing injury and illness surveillance studies (ISS) at all major World Rugby Tournaments. All ISS are conducted by selected research consultants in accordance with the definitions and protocols described in the World Rugby approved International Consensus Statement on definitions and procedures for injury surveillance studies in Rugby
[1]
. Findings from ISS are reported back to relevant parties within World Rugby and are made accessible to members of the public through
World Rugby Player Welfare webpage
.
b) Research Objectives
The overall aim of the Injury and Illness surveillance programme is to investigate the nature of injuries and illnesses sustained by players across World Rugby competitions. For example, the data collected during the course of the research programme are used to:
identify injuries or illnesses that are prominent in their frequency, or that carry the highest severity in terms of time lost from subsequent participation;
assess trends in injury or illness patterns over time (e.g. across the HSBC Sevens World Series);
identify factors that may predispose or protect players from injury or illness;
evaluate the efficacy of preventive measures (e.g. introducing a law change to lower the legal height of the tackle)
The overall intended effect of the Injury and Illness surveillance programme is to enhance player safety over time by ensuring that the risk of injury and illness that players are exposed to remain acceptable.
c) Assessment of necessity and proportionality
Processing data gathered through ISS is necessary to manage injury risks and in the general interests of enhancing player welfare.
As the risk of injury and illness can fluctuate over time in response to various factors, there is scope to continually improve and enhance player safety. The ISS programme is essential to ensuring that World Rugby can continue to achieve its aim of improving player welfare by enabling monitoring and evaluating injury risk management initiatives.
Without understanding the issues that dominate rugby from an injury frequency and severity perspective, it would be impossible for World Rugby to implement evidence-based player welfare initiatives and/or changes to the laws of the game or other regulatory requirements in order to improve player safety. In support of this, World Rugby’s attempts to enhance the detection and management of concussion across rugby partly originated from the findings of ISS that pointed towards a high proportion of players continuing to play rugby despite having suffered a concussion. Furthermore, the efficacy of preventive measures targeting head injuries across rugby is heavily reliant on the findings of IISS.
World Rugby has been identified across the sports governance world as having taken a leadership role across all sports in injury risk management and the World Rugby ISS reflects and helps to drive best practice across all sports from an injury analysis perspective.
Data is accessed only by a dedicated research unit within World Rugby who are experienced in handling sensitive research data. The mandate for using this data has been approved by the Ethics Committee and is restricted in its use to player welfare. The independence of the ISS Consultant, who has access to the full dataset of each ISS, ensures that the data collected pursuant to the ISS cannot be used by World Rugby for other functions or purposes.
World Rugby and Dovetail staff who have access to the full data set of each ISS have such access for administrative and support purposes only and to ensure that appropriate access controls are in place and adhered to.
The quality of the data collected by World Rugby pursuant to each ISS Project is dependent on the accuracy and quality of the information collected by the relevant doctors and medics supporting each team. It is the responsibility of such doctors and medics to ensure that the data are completed correctly and that the data submitted to World Rugby are accurate. However, the ISS Consultants responsible for implementing World Rugby ISS Projects actively follow up with each team involved in a competition to ensure that the data are complete.
In order to reduce the extent to which players may be identified from the ISS Data used in the ISS programme, the use of pseudonymised player reference numbers instead of player names has been adopted. It is necessary, however, to retain information which may in some way enable players to be identified (e.g. team represented, playing position) as these data are necessary to provide insight into injury risk factors.
World Rugby takes a number of steps to ensure that players whose data may be collected pursuant to the ISS Project are informed about and understand the uses that will be made of their data in connection with such research. These steps include:
In respect of tournaments organised and controlled by World Rugby, World Rugby’s Participation Agreement, which all participating players sign, includes notification that ISS data may be collected and used for player welfare research purposes;
Implementation of an ISS at every relevant World Rugby Tournament is a condition of the Terms of Participation of each such tournament and players sign up to the Terms of Participation which sets out the requirement for an ISS. Separately to the players signing up to the relevant Tournament Terms of Participation, they are also provided with an opportunity to request to be excluded from the study. This is on the basis that it is considered appropriate and wholly consistent with player rights and player welfare that a player’s data be included in the ISS Project, only where that player is happy for such data to be so included.
Information regarding player’s rights with respect to their ISS Data is included in the Player information notices included in the Participation Agreement for World Rugby tournaments.
Data will be submitted by and made available to Participating Unions from around the world in connection with the ISS. All Member Unions of World Rugby have signed the World Rugby Data Protection Framework Agreement which implements a number of safeguards in respect of personal data which is transferred to jurisdictions outside of the EEA.
[1]
Fuller et al., 2007
Accessibility
World Rugby: We value your privacy.
We and our third parties store, access and/or process information about your personal data, your devices and your online interactions using cookies, so we can provide, analyse and improve our services. This includes unique identifiers, such as your name and geolocation, or your browsing data.

With your permission we and our third parties may use precise geolocation data and identification through device scanning. You may click to consent to our and our third parties processing as described above. Alternatively you may access more detailed information and change your preferences before consenting or to refuse consenting. Please note that some processing of your personal data may not require your consent, but you have a right to object to such processing. Your preferences will apply to this website only.

You’re able to manage and withdraw your consent at any time via our cookie settings. To find out more, read our
Cookie Policy
Reject All
Accept All Cookies
Cookies Settings
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label